Utah statutes.
55-12-100.   Interstate Compact for Juveniles -- Execution of compact.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Interstate Compact for Juveniles."

(2)  The governor is authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of this state with any other state or states substantially in the form of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2005 General Session

